Utah statutes.
58-37c-18.   Recordkeeping requirements for sale of crystal iodine.

(1)  Any person licensed to engage in a regulated transaction and who sells crystal iodine to another person shall:

(a)  comply with the recordkeeping requirements of Section 58-37c-10;

(b)  require photo identification of the purchaser;

(c)  obtain from the purchaser a signature on a certificate of identification provided by the seller; and

(d)  obtain from the purchaser a legible fingerprint, preferably of the right thumb, which shall be placed on the certificate next to the purchaser's signature.

(2)  Any failure to comply with Subsection (1) is a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

